Connecticut, session 2026, HB05448.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective from passage) In any prosecution for an
offense, no federal officer, employee or agent shall have immunity for
any action taken under color of federal law, unless such officer's,
employee's or agent's action was: (1) Authorized by federal law; and (2)
necessary and proper to execute such officer's, employee's or agent's
official duties as a federal officer, employee or agent.
Sec. 2. Section 7-291c of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) No law enforcement unit, as defined in section 7-294a, shall hire
any person as a police officer, as defined in said section 7-294a, who was
previously employed as a federal law enforcement official or police
officer by such unit or in any other jurisdiction and who (1) was
dismissed for malfeasance or other serious misconduct calling into
question such person's fitness to serve as a police officer; or (2) resigned
or retired from such official's or officer's position while under
LCO No. 2546 1 of 3

Raised Bill No. 5448
investigation for such malfeasance or other serious misconduct.
(b) Any law enforcement unit that has knowledge that any former
police officer of such unit who (1) (A) was dismissed for malfeasance or
other serious misconduct, or (B) resigned or retired from such officer's
position while under investigation for such malfeasance or other serious
misconduct; and (2) is an applicant for the position of police officer with
any other law enforcement unit, shall inform such other unit and the
Police Officer Standards and Training Council established under section
7-294b of such dismissal, resignation or retirement.
(c) The provisions of this section shall not apply to any federal law
enforcement official or police officer who is exonerated of each
allegation against such official or officer of such malfeasance or other
serious misconduct.
(d) For purposes of this section, (1) "malfeasance" means the
commonly approved usage of "malfeasance"; and (2) "serious
misconduct" means improper or illegal actions taken by a federal law
enforcement official or police officer in connection with such official's or
officer's official duties that could result in a miscarriage of justice or
discrimination, including, but not limited to, (A) a conviction of a felony,
(B) fabrication of evidence, (C) repeated use of excessive force, (D)
acceptance of a bribe, or (E) the commission of fraud.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 7-291c